Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2744.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-111, to read: START_STATUTE23-111. Commission; investigation; overtime wage; employers; rules; definitions A. The commission may investigate and adjudicate matters that are related to overtime wage pay violations. B. An employee shall file a complaint with the commission not more than one year after the alleged violation occurred. C. The commission shall adopt rules that provide all of the following: 1. The process on how an employee or the employee's authorized representative shall file a COMPLAINT. 2. How an employer will receive notice of the complaint from the commission. 3. The time frames related to response periods. 4. The commission's investigation procedures. D. The commission may do any of the following in an overtime wage adjudication case: 1. Administer oaths and affirmations. 2. Issue subpoenas. 3. Compel the attendance of witnesses. 4. Compel the production of records. 5. Conduct hearings under oath. 6. Issue determinations pursuant to section 44-1201 that include an order for the payment of wages that are owed, including interest. E. This section does not prevent an employee from seeking other remedies at law. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Commission" means the industrial commission of Arizona. 2. "Employee" has the same meaning prescribed in section 23-493. 3. "Overtime wage": (a) means wages that are owed for hours worked in excess of the statutory workweek as defined in 29 Code of Federal Regulations section 778.105. (b) Includes premium pay as agreed on by the employee and employer, but not less than one hundred fifty percent of the base rate of pay.END_STATUTE